Maryland, session 2025, HB0185.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
8–420.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Developmental delays, physical disabilities, or delays in social,
emotional, or behavioral functioning” means:
(i) A significant developmental delay or atypical development, as
identified by a health professional, in:
1. Cognitive development;
2. Physical development;
3. Language and speech development;
– 1 –

Ch. 238 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
4. Psychosocial development; or
5. Self–help skills;
(ii) Psychological trauma, as identified through an evaluation by a
mental health professional; or
(iii) A diagnosed physical, developmental, or mental health condition
that impacts daily living and limits participation in typical early childhood education or
child care settings.
(3) “Program” means the Therapeutic Child Care Grant Program.
(b) There is a Therapeutic Child Care Grant Program in the State.
(c) (1) The purpose of the Program is to provide grants to providers that
specialize in providing child care and early childhood education to children under the age
of 6 years who have developmental delays, physical disabilities, or delays in social,
emotional, or behavioral functioning.
(2) The Department shall administer the Program.
(3) On or before August 15 each year, the Department shall award grants
under this section.
(d) (1) For each of fiscal years 2023 through 2025, AND FOR EACH OF FISCAL
YEARS 2027 THROUGH 2029, AND FOR FISCAL YEAR 2027 AND EACH FISCAL YEAR
THEREAFTER, the Governor shall include in the annual budget bill an appropriation of
$3,700,000 to the Program.
(2) In awarding grants under the Program, the Department shall
distribute:
(i) $1,283,000 to existing providers in the same amount as was
provided in fiscal year 2022;
(ii) $1,917,000 to existing providers in the same proportion as was
provided in fiscal year 2022 to provide additional services; and
(iii) Except as provided in paragraph (3) of this subsection, $500,000
to new providers or existing providers to enroll additional children.
(3) If funds are remaining after the distribution required under paragraph
(2)(iii) of this subsection, then the remainder shall be distributed as provided under
paragraph (2)(ii) of this subsection FOR EACH OF FISCAL YEARS 2027 THROUGH 2029,
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 238
THE GOVERNOR SHALL INCLUDE IN THE ANNUAL BUDGET BILL AN APPROPRIATION
OF $1,500,000 TO THE PROGRAM.
(2) In awarding grants under the Program, the Department shall distribute:
(i) $1,283,000 to existing providers in the same amount as was
provided in fiscal year 2022;
(ii) $1,917,000 to existing providers in the same proportion as was
provided in fiscal year 2022 to provide additional services; and
(iii) Except as provided in paragraph (3) of this subsection, $500,000
to new providers or existing providers to enroll additional children.
(3) If funds are remaining after the distribution required under paragraph
(2)(iii) of this subsection, then the remainder shall be distributed as provided under
paragraph (2)(ii) of this subsection.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 6, 2025.
– 3 –